dictionaries/uz_Latn_UZ/uz_Latn_UZ.aff
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizgaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlarimizdaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizni [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringiznimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringiznidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringiznida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringiznidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringiznimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizning [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizningmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizningdir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizningda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizningdirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizningmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizningku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizgami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizgadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizgada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizgadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizgamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizgaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringizdaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingni [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingnimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingnidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingnida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingnidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingnimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ainggami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ainggadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ainggada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ainggadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ainggamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ainggaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 aingdaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingni [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingnimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingnidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingnida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingnidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingnimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganinggami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganinggadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganinggada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganinggadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganinggamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganinggaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganingdaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringni [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringnimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringnidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringnida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringnidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringnimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringgami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringgadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringgada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringgadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringgamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringgaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 adiganlaringdaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingni [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingnimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingnidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingnida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingnidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingnimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayinggami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayinggadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayinggada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayinggadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayinggamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayinggaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayingdaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingni [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingnimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingnidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingnida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingnidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingnimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganinggami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganinggadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganinggada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganinggadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganinggamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganinggaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganingdaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringni [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringnimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringnidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringnida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringnidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringnimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringgami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringgadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringgada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringgadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringgamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringgaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 maydiganlaringdaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
